Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-518
Buildings; condemnation or repair orders; time and place of hearing; jurisdiction of district court.

The court, upon application of the State Fire Marshal, shall make its order fixing a time and place for such hearing, which place may be at any convenient point within the judicial district, and which time shall be within ten days from the date of the filing of the answer, or as soon thereafter as may be. If upon such trial the order shall be sustained, judgment shall be given accordingly, and fixing a time within which the building shall be altered, destroyed or repaired, as the case may be, in compliance with such order, but otherwise the court shall annul and set aside the order of condemnation.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 17, p. 486;

C.S.1929, § 81-5517;

R.S.1943, § 81-518.

Legislative policy contemplates that the owner shall have a trial and a determination on the merits in district court. In re Application of Iverson, 151 Neb. 802, 39 N.W.2d 797 (1949).